Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. Contributions.

Sec. 10.50.275.
Consideration for company interests.

An interest in a limited liability company may be issued for property or services rendered. A member who has contributed property or services rendered may also contribute a promissory note or other obligation to contribute property or services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.280.
Liability for contributions.

Notwithstanding AS

09.25.010

—

09.25.020

, a promise by a member of a limited liability company to contribute property or services to the company is not enforceable unless the promise is stated in a writing signed by the member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a member of a limited liability company is liable for performing an enforceable promise made to the company to contribute property or services, even if the member is unable to perform because of death, disability, or another reason.

If a member of a limited liability company does not make the member’s required contribution of property or services, the member shall, at the option of the company, contribute cash equal to that portion of value of the required contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, an assignor of a limited liability company interest is not released from the assignor’s liability to the company under this section, even if the assignee becomes a member with respect to the assigned interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.285.
Compromise of contribution obligation.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, the obligation of a member to make a contribution to a limited liability company may not be compromised, unless all of the other members consent to the compromise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)